Nebraska, session 109, LB690.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB690 LB690
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 23-187, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
23-187 (1) In addition to the powers granted by section 23-104, a
county may, in the manner specified by sections 23-187 to 23-193,
regulate the following subjects by ordinance:
(a) Parking of motor vehicles on public roads, highways, and rights-
of-way as it pertains to snow removal for and access by emergency
vehicles to areas within the county;
(b) Motor vehicles as defined in section 60-339 that are abandoned
on public or private property;
(c) Low-speed vehicles as described and operated pursuant to section
60-6,380;
(d) Golf car vehicles as described and operated pursuant to section
60-6,381;
(e) Graffiti on public or private property;
(f) False alarms from electronic security systems that result in
requests for emergency response from law enforcement or other emergency
responders;
(g) Violation of the public peace and good order of the county by
disorderly conduct, lewd or lascivious behavior, or public nudity;
(h) Peddlers, hawkers, or solicitors operating for commercial
purposes. If a county adopts an ordinance under this subdivision, the
ordinance shall provide for registration of any such peddler, hawker, or
solicitor without any fee and allow the operation or conduct of any
registered peddler, hawker, or solicitor in all areas of the county where
the county has jurisdiction and where a city or village has not otherwise
regulated such operation or conduct; and
(i) Operation of vehicles on any highway or restrictions on the
weight of vehicles pursuant to section 60-681; and .
(j) Operation of all-terrain vehicles and utility-type vehicles
pursuant to section 60-6,356 on county roads and township roads outside
-2-

LB690 LB690
2025 2025
the corporate limits of a city or village.
(2) For the enforcement of any ordinance authorized by this section,
a county may impose fines, forfeitures, or penalties and provide for the
recovery, collection, and enforcement of such fines, forfeitures, or
penalties. A county may also authorize such other measures for the
enforcement of ordinances as may be necessary and proper. A fine enacted
pursuant to this section shall not exceed five hundred dollars for each
offense.
Sec. 2. Section 60-103, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
60-103 All-terrain vehicle means any motorized off-highway device
manufactured for off-road use that which (1) is fifty inches or less in
width, (2) has a dry weight of twelve hundred pounds or less, (3) travels
on three or more nonhighway tires, and (4) is designed for operator use
only with no passengers or is specifically designed by the original
manufacturer for the operator and one passenger.
Sec. 3. Section 60-123, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
60-123 Motor vehicle means any vehicle propelled by any power other
than muscular power. Motor vehicle does not include (1) mopeds, (2) farm
tractors, (3) self-propelled equipment designed and used exclusively to
carry and apply fertilizer, chemicals, or related products to
agricultural soil and crops, agricultural floater-spreader implements,
and other implements of husbandry designed for and used primarily for
tilling the soil and harvesting crops or feeding livestock, (4) power
unit hay grinders or a combination which includes a power unit and a hay
grinder when operated without cargo, (5) vehicles which run only on rails
or tracks, (6) off-road designed vehicles not authorized by law for use
on a highway, including, but not limited to, golf car vehicles, go-carts,
riding lawnmowers, garden tractors, all-terrain vehicles, utility-type
vehicles, snowmobiles registered or exempt from registration under
-3-

LB690 LB690
2025 2025
sections 60-3,207 to 60-3,219, and minibikes, (7) road and general-
purpose construction and maintenance machinery not designed or used
primarily for the transportation of persons or property, including, but
not limited to, ditchdigging apparatus, asphalt spreaders, bucket
loaders, leveling graders, earthmoving carryalls, power shovels,
earthmoving equipment, and crawler tractors, (8) self-propelled chairs
used by persons who are disabled, (9) electric personal assistive
mobility devices, and (10) bicycles as defined in section 60-611.
Sec. 4. Section 60-135.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
60-135.01 (1) Utility-type vehicle means any motorized off-highway
device manufactured for off-road use that which (a) is seventy-four
inches in width or less, (b) is not more than one hundred eighty inches,
including the bumper, in length, (c) has a dry weight of two thousand
pounds or less, and (d) travels on four or more nonhighway tires.
(2) Utility-type vehicle does not include all-terrain vehicles, golf
car vehicles, or low-speed vehicles.
Sec. 5. Section 60-153, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
60-153 (1)(a) (1) A certificate of title shall be printed upon
safety security paper to be selected by the department.
(b) The certificate of title, manufacturer's statement of origin,
and assignment of manufacturer's certificate shall be upon forms
prescribed by the department and may include, but shall not be limited
to, county of issuance, date of issuance, certificate of title number,
previous certificate of title number, vehicle identification number,
year, make, model, and body type of the vehicle, name and residential and
mailing address of the owner, acquisition date, issuing county
treasurer's signature and official seal, and sufficient space for the
notation and release of liens, mortgages, or encumbrances, if any.
(c) A certificate of title issued on or after September 1, 2007,
-4-

LB690 LB690
2025 2025
shall include the words "void if altered". A certificate of title that is
altered shall be deemed a mutilated certificate of title.
(d) The certificate of title of an all-terrain vehicle or , utility-
type vehicle shall include the words "manufactured for off-road use". ,
or
(e) The certificate of title of a minibike shall include the words
"not to be registered for road use".
(2) An assignment of certificate of title shall appear on each
certificate of title and shall include, but not be limited to, a
statement that the owner of the vehicle assigns all his or her right,
title, and interest in the vehicle, the name and address of the assignee,
the name and address of the lienholder or secured party, if any, and the
signature of the owner or the owner's parent, legal guardian, foster
parent, or agent in the case of an owner who is a handicapped or disabled
person as defined in section 60-331.02.
(3) A reassignment by a dealer shall appear on each certificate of
title and shall include, but not be limited to, a statement that the
dealer assigns all his or her right, title, and interest in the vehicle,
the name and address of the assignee, the name and address of the
lienholder or secured party, if any, and the signature of the dealer or
designated representative. Reassignments shall be printed on the reverse
side of each certificate of title as many times as convenient.
(4) The department may prescribe a secure power-of-attorney form and
may contract with one or more persons to develop, provide, sell, and
distribute secure power-of-attorney forms in the manner authorized or
required by the federal Truth in Mileage Act of 1986 and any other
federal law or regulation. Any secure power-of-attorney form authorized
pursuant to a contract shall conform to the terms of the contract and be
in strict compliance with the requirements of the department.
(5) A certificate of title for a former military vehicle shall
include the words "former military vehicle".
-5-

LB690 LB690
2025 2025
Sec. 6. Section 60-305, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
60-305 All-terrain vehicle means any motor vehicle manufactured for
off-road use that motorized off-highway vehicle which (1) is fifty inches
or less in width, (2) has a dry weight of twelve hundred pounds or less,
(3) travels on three or more nonhighway tires, and (4) is designed for
operator use only with no passengers or is specifically designed by the
original manufacturer for the operator and one passenger. All-terrain
vehicles which have been modified or retrofitted with after-market parts
to include additional equipment not required by sections 60-6,357 and
60-6,358 shall not be registered under the Motor Vehicle Registration
Act, nor shall such modified or retrofitted vehicles be eligible for
registration in any other category of vehicle defined in the act.
Sec. 7. Section 60-339, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
60-339 Motor vehicle means any vehicle propelled by any power other
than muscular power. Motor vehicle does not include (1) mopeds, (2) farm
tractors, (3) self-propelled equipment designed and used exclusively to
carry and apply fertilizer, chemicals, or related products to
agricultural soil and crops, agricultural floater-spreader implements,
and other implements of husbandry designed for and used primarily for
tilling the soil and harvesting crops or feeding livestock, (4) power
unit hay grinders or a combination which includes a power unit and a hay
grinder when operated without cargo, (5) vehicles which run only on rails
or tracks, (6) off-road designed vehicles not authorized by law for use
on a highway, including, but not limited to, golf car vehicles, go-carts,
riding lawnmowers, garden tractors, all-terrain vehicles, utility-type
vehicles, snowmobiles registered or exempt from registration under
sections 60-3,207 to 60-3,219, and minibikes, (7) road and general-
purpose construction and maintenance machinery not designed or used
primarily for the transportation of persons or property, including, but
-6-

LB690 LB690
2025 2025
not limited to, ditchdigging apparatus, asphalt spreaders, bucket
loaders, leveling graders, earthmoving carryalls, power shovels,
earthmoving equipment, and crawler tractors, (8) self-propelled chairs
used by persons who are disabled, (9) electric personal assistive
mobility devices, and (10) bicycles as defined in section 60-611.
Sec. 8. Section 60-358.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
60-358.01 (1) Utility-type vehicle means any motor vehicle
manufactured for off-road use that motorized off-highway vehicle which
(a) is seventy-four inches in width or less, (b) is not more than one
hundred eighty inches, including the bumper, in length, (c) has a dry
weight of two thousand pounds or less, and (d) travels on four or more
nonhighway tires. Utility-type vehicles which have been modified or
retrofitted with after-market parts to include additional equipment not
required by sections 60-6,357 and 60-6,358 shall not be registered under
the Motor Vehicle Registration Act, nor shall such modified or
retrofitted vehicles be eligible for registration in any other category
of vehicle defined in the act.
(2) Utility-type vehicle does not include all-terrain vehicles, golf
car vehicles, or low-speed vehicles.
Sec. 9. Section 60-3,100, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
60-3,100 (1) The department shall issue to every person whose motor
vehicle or trailer is registered one or two fully reflectorized license
plates upon which shall be displayed (a) the registration number
consisting of letters and numerals assigned to such motor vehicle or
trailer in figures not less than two and one-half inches nor more than
three inches in height and (b) also the word Nebraska suitably lettered
so as to be attractive. The license plates shall be of a color designated
by the director. The color of the plates shall be changed each time the
license plates are changed. Each time the license plates are changed, the
-7-

LB690 LB690
2025 2025
director shall secure competitive bids for materials pursuant to the
State Procurement Act. Autocycle, motorcycle, minitruck, low-speed
vehicle, all-terrain vehicle and utility-type vehicle, and trailer
license plate letters and numerals may be one-half the size of those
required in this section.
(2)(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, two license
plates shall be issued for every motor vehicle.
(b) One license plate shall be issued for (i) all-terrain vehicles
and utility type vehicles, (ii) apportionable vehicles, (iii) (ii) buses,
(iv) (iii) dealers, (v) (iv) minitrucks, (vi) (v) motorcycles, other than
autocycles, (vii) (vi) special interest motor vehicles that use the
special interest motor vehicle license plate authorized by and issued
under section 60-3,135.01, (viii) (vii) trailers, and (ix) (viii) truck-
tractors.
(c)(i) One license plate shall be issued, upon request and
compliance with this subdivision, for any passenger car which is not
manufactured to be equipped with a bracket on the front of the vehicle to
display a license plate. A license decal shall be issued with the license
plate as provided in subdivision (ii) of this subdivision and shall be
displayed on the driver's side of the windshield. In order to request a
single license plate and license decal, there shall be an additional
annual nonrefundable registration fee of fifty dollars plus the cost of
the decal paid to the county treasurer at the time of registration. All
fees collected under this subdivision shall be remitted to the State
Treasurer for credit to the Highway Trust Fund.
(ii) The department shall design, procure, and furnish to the county
treasurers a license decal which shall be displayed as evidence that a
license plate has been obtained under this subdivision. Each county
treasurer shall furnish a license decal to the person obtaining the
plate.
(d) When two license plates are issued, one shall be prominently
-8-

LB690 LB690
2025 2025
displayed at all times on the front and one on the rear of the registered
motor vehicle or trailer. When only one plate is issued, it shall be
prominently displayed on the rear of the registered motor vehicle or
trailer. When only one plate is issued for motor vehicles registered
pursuant to section 60-3,198 and truck-tractors, it shall be prominently
displayed on the front of the apportionable vehicle.
Sec. 10. Section 60-3,104, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
60-3,104 The department shall issue the following types of license
plates:
(1) All-terrain vehicle and utility-type vehicle license plates
issued pursuant to section 60-3,100;
(2) (1) Amateur radio station license plates issued pursuant to
section 60-3,126;
(3) (2) Apportionable vehicle license plates issued pursuant to
section 60-3,203;
(4) (3) Autocycle license plates issued pursuant to section
60-3,100;
(5) (4) Boat dealer license plates issued pursuant to section
60-379;
(6) (5) Breast Cancer Awareness Plates issued pursuant to sections
60-3,230 and 60-3,231;
(7) (6) Bus license plates issued pursuant to section 60-3,144;
(8) (7) Choose Life License Plates issued pursuant to sections
60-3,232 and 60-3,233;
(9) (8) Commercial motor vehicle license plates issued pursuant to
section 60-3,147;
(10) (9) Czech Heritage Plates issued pursuant to sections 60-3,259
and 60-3,260;
(11) (10) Dealer or manufacturer license plates issued pursuant to
sections 60-3,114 and 60-3,115;
-9-

LB690 LB690
2025 2025
(12) (11) Disabled veteran license plates issued pursuant to section
60-3,124;
(13) (12) Donate Life Plates issued pursuant to sections 60-3,245
and 60-3,246;
(14) (13) Down Syndrome Awareness Plates issued pursuant to sections
60-3,247 and 60-3,248;
(15) (14) Farm trailer license plates issued pursuant to section
60-3,151;
(16) (15) Farm truck license plates issued pursuant to section
60-3,146;
(17) (16) Farm trucks with a gross weight of over sixteen tons
license plates issued pursuant to section 60-3,146;
(18) (17) Fertilizer trailer license plates issued pursuant to
section 60-3,151;
(19) (18) Former military vehicle license plates issued pursuant to
section 60-3,236;
(20) (19) Gold Star Family license plates issued pursuant to
sections 60-3,122.01 and 60-3,122.02;
(21) (20) Handicapped or disabled person license plates issued
pursuant to section 60-3,113;
(22) (21) Historical vehicle license plates issued pursuant to
sections 60-3,130 to 60-3,134;
(23) (22) Josh the Otter-Be Safe Around Water Plates issued pursuant
to section 60-3,258;
(24) (23) Local truck license plates issued pursuant to section
60-3,145;
(25) (24) Metropolitan utilities district license plates issued
pursuant to section 60-3,228;
(26) (25) Military Honor Plates issued pursuant to sections
60-3,122.03 and 60-3,122.04;
(27) (26) Minitruck license plates issued pursuant to section
-10-

LB690 LB690
2025 2025
60-3,100;
(28) (27) Motor vehicle license plates for motor vehicles owned or
operated by the state, counties, municipalities, or school districts
issued pursuant to section 60-3,105;
(29) (28) Motor vehicles exempt pursuant to section 60-3,107;
(30) (29) Motorcycle license plates issued pursuant to section
60-3,100;
(31) (30) Mountain Lion Conservation Plates issued pursuant to
sections 60-3,226 and 60-3,227;
(32) (31) Native American Cultural Awareness and History Plates
issued pursuant to sections 60-3,234 and 60-3,235;
(33) (32) Nebraska Cornhusker Spirit Plates issued pursuant to
sections 60-3,127 to 60-3,129;
(34) (33) Nebraska History Plates issued pursuant to sections
60-3,255 and 60-3,256;
(35) (34) Nebraska 150 Sesquicentennial Plates issued pursuant to
sections 60-3,223 to 60-3,225;
(36) (35) Nonresident owner thirty-day license plates issued
pursuant to section 60-382;
(37) (36) Passenger car having a seating capacity of ten persons or
less and not used for hire issued pursuant to section 60-3,143 other than
autocycles;
(38) (37) Passenger car having a seating capacity of ten persons or
less and used for hire issued pursuant to section 60-3,143 other than
autocycles;
(39) (38) Pearl Harbor license plates issued pursuant to section
60-3,122;
(40) (39) Personal-use dealer license plates issued pursuant to
section 60-3,116;
(41) (40) Personalized message license plates for motor vehicles,
trailers, and semitrailers, except motor vehicles, trailers, and
-11-

LB690 LB690
2025 2025
semitrailers registered under section 60-3,198, issued pursuant to
sections 60-3,118 to 60-3,121;
(42) (41) Pets for Vets Plates issued pursuant to sections 60-3,249
and 60-3,250;
(43) (42) Prisoner-of-war license plates issued pursuant to section
60-3,123;
(44) (43) Prostate Cancer Awareness Plates issued pursuant to
section 60-3,240;
(45) (44) Public power district license plates issued pursuant to
section 60-3,228;
(46) (45) Purple Heart license plates issued pursuant to section
60-3,125;
(47) (46) Recreational vehicle license plates issued pursuant to
section 60-3,151;
(48) (47) Repossession license plates issued pursuant to section
60-375;
(49) (48) Sammy's Superheroes license plates for childhood cancer
awareness issued pursuant to section 60-3,242;
(50) (49) Special interest motor vehicle license plates issued
pursuant to section 60-3,135.01;
(51) (50) Specialty license plates issued pursuant to sections
60-3,104.01 and 60-3,104.02;
(52) (51) Support the Arts Plates issued pursuant to sections
60-3,251 and 60-3,252;
(53) (52) Support Our Troops Plates issued pursuant to sections
60-3,243 and 60-3,244;
(54) (53) The Good Life Is Outside Plates issued pursuant to
sections 60-3,253 and 60-3,254;
(55) (54) Trailer license plates issued for trailers owned or
operated by the state, counties, municipalities, or school districts
issued pursuant to section 60-3,106;
-12-

LB690 LB690
2025 2025
(56) (55) Trailer license plates issued for trailers owned or
operated by a metropolitan utilities district or public power district
pursuant to section 60-3,228;
(57) (56) Trailer license plates issued pursuant to section
60-3,100;
(58) (57) Trailers exempt pursuant to section 60-3,108;
(59) (58) Transporter license plates issued pursuant to section
60-378;
(60) (59) Trucks or combinations of trucks, truck-tractors, or
trailers which are not for hire and engaged in soil and water
conservation work and used for the purpose of transporting pipe and
equipment exclusively used by such contractors for soil and water
conservation construction license plates issued pursuant to section
60-3,149;
(61) (60) Utility trailer license plates issued pursuant to section
60-3,151;
(62) (61) Well-boring apparatus and well-servicing equipment license
plates issued pursuant to section 60-3,109; and
(63) (62) Wildlife Conservation Plates issued pursuant to section
60-3,238.
Sec. 11. Section 60-3,135.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is amended to read:
60-3,135.01 (1) The department shall either modify an existing plate
design or design license plates to identify special interest motor
vehicles, to be known as special interest motor vehicle license plates.
The department, in designing such special interest motor vehicle license
plates, shall include the words special interest and limit the
manufacturing cost of each plate to an amount less than or equal to the
amount charged for license plates pursuant to section 60-3,102. The
department shall choose the design of the plate. The department shall
make applications available for this type of plate when it is designed.
-13-

LB690 LB690
2025 2025
(2) One type of special interest motor vehicle license plate shall
be alphanumeric plates. The department shall:
(a) Assign a designation up to seven characters; and
(b) Not use a county designation.
(3) One type of special interest motor vehicle license plate shall
be personalized message plates. Such plates shall be issued subject to
the same conditions specified for personalized message license plates in
section 60-3,118.
(4) A person may apply to the department for a special interest
motor vehicle license plate in lieu of regular license plates on an
application prescribed and provided by the department for any special
interest motor vehicle, except that no motor vehicle registered under
section 60-3,198, autocycle, motorcycle, all-terrain vehicle, utility-
type vehicle, or trailer shall be eligible for special interest motor
vehicle license plates. The department shall make forms available for
such applications through the county treasurers.
(5) The form shall contain a description of the special interest
motor vehicle owned and sought to be registered, including the make, body
type, model, serial number, and year of manufacture.
(6)(a) In addition to all other fees required to register a motor
vehicle, each application for initial issuance or renewal of a special
interest motor vehicle license plate shall be accompanied by a special
interest motor vehicle license plate fee of fifty dollars. Twenty-five
dollars of the special interest motor vehicle license plate fee shall be
remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Department of Motor
Vehicles Cash Fund, and twenty-five dollars of the special interest motor
vehicle license plate fee shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for
credit to the Highway Trust Fund.
(b) If a special interest motor vehicle license plate is lost,
stolen, or mutilated, the owner shall be issued a replacement license
plate pursuant to section 60-3,157.
-14-

LB690 LB690
2025 2025
(7) When the department receives an application for a special
interest motor vehicle license plate, the department may deliver the
plate and registration certificate to the applicant by United States mail
or to the county treasurer of the county in which the special interest
motor vehicle is registered and the delivery of the plate and
registration certificate shall be made through a secure process and
system. If delivery of the plates and registration certificate is made by
the department to the applicant, the department may charge a postage and
handling fee in an amount not more than necessary to recover the cost of
postage and handling for the specific items mailed to the registrant. The
department shall remit the fee to the State Treasurer for credit to the
Department of Motor Vehicles Cash Fund. The county treasurer or the
department shall issue the special interest motor vehicle license plate
in lieu of regular license plates when the applicant complies with the
other provisions of the Motor Vehicle Registration Act for registration
of the special interest motor vehicle.
(8) If the cost of manufacturing special interest motor vehicle
license plates at any time exceeds the amount charged for license plates
pursuant to section 60-3,102, any money to be credited to the Department
of Motor Vehicles Cash Fund under this section shall instead be credited
first to the Highway Trust Fund in an amount equal to the difference
between the manufacturing costs of special interest motor vehicle license
plates and the amount charged pursuant to section 60-3,102 with respect
to such license plates and the remainder shall be credited to the
Department of Motor Vehicles Cash Fund.
(9) The special interest motor vehicle license plate shall be
affixed to the rear of the special interest motor vehicle.
(10) A special interest motor vehicle shall not be used for the same
purposes and under the same conditions as other motor vehicles of the
same type and shall not be used for business or occupation or regularly
for transportation to and from work. A special interest motor vehicle may
-15-

LB690 LB690
2025 2025
be driven on the public streets and roads only for occasional
transportation, public displays, parades, and related pleasure or hobby
activities.
(11) It shall be unlawful to own or operate a motor vehicle with
special interest motor vehicle license plates in violation of this
section. Upon conviction of a violation of any provision of this section,
a person shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor.
(12) For purposes of this section, special interest motor vehicle
means a motor vehicle of any age which is being collected, preserved,
restored, or maintained by the owner as a leisure pursuit and not used
for general transportation of persons or cargo.
Sec. 12. Section 60-3,143, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
60-3,143 (1) For all-terrain vehicles, the registration fee shall be
ten dollars.
(2) (1) For autocycles, the registration fee shall be as provided in
section 60-3,153.
(3) For utility-type vehicles, the registration fee shall be ten
dollars.
(4) (2) For every motor vehicle of ten-passenger capacity or less
and not used for hire, the registration fee shall be fifteen dollars.
(5) (3) For each motor vehicle having a seating capacity of ten
persons or less and used for hire, the registration fee shall be six
dollars plus an additional four dollars for every person such motor
vehicle is equipped to carry in addition to the driver.
(6) (4) For motor vehicles leased for hire when no driver or
chauffeur is furnished by the lessor as part of the consideration paid
for by the lessee, incident to the operation of the leased motor vehicle,
the fee shall be fifteen dollars.
Sec. 13. Section 60-3,187, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
-16-

LB690 LB690
2025 2025
60-3,187 (1) The motor vehicle tax schedules are set out in this
section.
(2) The motor vehicle tax shall be calculated by multiplying the
base tax times the fraction that which corresponds to the age category of
the vehicle as shown in the following table:
YEAR FRACTION
First 1.00
Second 0.90
Third 0.80
Fourth 0.70
Fifth 0.60
Sixth 0.51
Seventh 0.42
Eighth 0.33
Ninth 0.24
Tenth and Eleventh 0.15
Twelfth and Thirteenth 0.07
Fourteenth and older 0.00
(3) The base tax shall be:
(a) Automobiles, autocycles, and motorcycles — An amount determined
using the following table:
Value when new Base tax
Up to $3,999 $ 25
$4,000 to $5,999 35
$6,000 to $7,999 45
$8,000 to $9,999 60
$10,000 to $11,999 100
$12,000 to $13,999 140
$14,000 to $15,999 180
$16,000 to $17,999 220
-17-

LB690 LB690
2025 2025
$18,000 to $19,999 260
$20,000 to $21,999 300
$22,000 to $23,999 340
$24,000 to $25,999 380
$26,000 to $27,999 420
$28,000 to $29,999 460
$30,000 to $31,999 500
$32,000 to $33,999 540
$34,000 to $35,999 580
$36,000 to $37,999 620
$38,000 to $39,999 660
$40,000 to $41,999 700
$42,000 to $43,999 740
$44,000 to $45,999 780
$46,000 to $47,999 820
$48,000 to $49,999 860
$50,000 to $51,999 900
$52,000 to $53,999 940
$54,000 to $55,999 980
$56,000 to $57,999 1,020
$58,000 to $59,999 1,060
$60,000 to $61,999 1,100
$62,000 to $63,999 1,140
$64,000 to $65,999 1,180
$66,000 to $67,999 1,220
$68,000 to $69,999 1,260
$70,000 to $71,999 1,300
$72,000 to $73,999 1,340
$74,000 to $75,999 1,380
$76,000 to $77,999 1,420
-18-

LB690 LB690
2025 2025
$78,000 to $79,999 1,460
$80,000 to $81,999 1,500
$82,000 to $83,999 1,540
$84,000 to $85,999 1,580
$86,000 to $87,999 1,620
$88,000 to $89,999 1,660
$90,000 to $91,999 1,700
$92,000 to $93,999 1,740
$94,000 to $95,999 1,780
$96,000 to $97,999 1,820
$98,000 to $99,999 1,860
$100,000 and over 1,900
(b) Assembled automobiles — $60
(c) Assembled motorcycles other than autocycles — $25
(d) Cabin trailers, up to one thousand pounds — $10
(e) Cabin trailers, one thousand pounds and over and less than two
thousand pounds — $25
(f) Cabin trailers, two thousand pounds and over — $40
(g) Recreational vehicles, less than eight thousand pounds — $160
(h) Recreational vehicles, eight thousand pounds and over and less
than twelve thousand pounds — $410
(i) Recreational vehicles, twelve thousand pounds and over — $860
(j) Assembled recreational vehicles and buses shall follow the
schedules for body type and registered weight
(k) Trucks — Over seven tons and less than ten tons — $360
(l) Trucks — Ten tons and over and less than thirteen tons — $560
(m) Trucks — Thirteen tons and over and less than sixteen tons —
$760
(n) Trucks — Sixteen tons and over and less than twenty-five tons —
$960
(o) Trucks — Twenty-five tons and over — $1,160
-19-

LB690 LB690
2025 2025
(p) Buses — $360
(q) Trailers other than semitrailers — $10
(r) Semitrailers — $110
(s) Former military vehicles — $50
(t) Minitrucks — $50
(u) Low-speed vehicles — $50
(v) All-terrain vehicles and utility-type vehicles — $25
(4) For purposes of subsection (3) of this section, truck means all
trucks and combinations of trucks except those trucks, trailers, or
combinations thereof registered under section 60-3,198, and the tax is
based on the gross vehicle weight rating as reported by the manufacturer.
(5) Current model year vehicles are designated as first-year motor
vehicles for purposes of the schedules.
(6) When a motor vehicle is registered that which is newer than the
current model year by the manufacturer's designation, the motor vehicle
is subject to the initial motor vehicle tax in the first registration
period and ninety-five percent of the initial motor vehicle tax in the
second registration period.
(7) Assembled cabin trailers, assembled recreational vehicles, and
assembled buses shall be designated as sixth-year motor vehicles in their
first year of registration for purposes of the schedules.
(8) When a motor vehicle is registered that which is required to
have a title branded as previous salvage pursuant to section 60-174, the
motor vehicle tax shall be reduced by twenty-five percent.
Sec. 14. Section 60-3,190, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
60-3,190 (1) A motor vehicle fee is imposed on all motor vehicles
registered for operation in this state. An owner of a motor vehicle which
is exempt from the imposition of a motor vehicle tax pursuant to section
60-3,185 shall also be exempt from the imposition of the motor vehicle
fee imposed pursuant to this section.
-20-

LB690 LB690
2025 2025
(2) The department shall annually determine the motor vehicle fee on
each motor vehicle registered pursuant to this section and shall cause a
notice of the amount to be delivered to the registrant. The notice shall
be combined with the notice of the motor vehicle tax required by section
60-3,186.
(3) The motor vehicle fee schedules are set out in this subsection
and subsection (4) of this section. Except for automobiles with a value
when new of less than $20,000, and for assembled, reconstructed-
designated, and replica-designated automobiles, the fee shall be
calculated by multiplying the base fee times the fraction which
corresponds to the age category of the automobile as shown in the
following table:
YEAR FRACTION
First through fifth 1.00
Sixth through tenth .70
Eleventh and over .35
(4) The base fee shall be:
(a) Automobiles, with a value when new of less than $20,000, and
assembled, reconstructed-designated, and replica-designated automobiles —
$5
(b) Automobiles, with a value when new of $20,000 through $39,999 —
$20
(c) Automobiles, with a value when new of $40,000 or more — $30
(d) Motorcycles and autocycles — $10
(e) Recreational vehicles and cabin trailers — $10
(f) Trucks over seven tons and buses — $30
(g) Trailers other than semitrailers — $10
(h) Semitrailers — $30
(i) Former military vehicles — $10
(j) Minitrucks — $10
(k) Low-speed vehicles — $10 .
-21-

LB690 LB690
2025 2025
(l) All-terrain vehicles and utility-type vehicles — $10.
(5) The motor vehicle tax, motor vehicle fee, and registration fee
shall be paid to the county treasurer prior to the registration of the
motor vehicle for the following registration period. After retaining one
percent of the motor vehicle fee collected for costs, the remaining
proceeds shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Motor
Vehicle Fee Fund. The State Treasurer shall return funds from the Motor
Vehicle Fee Fund remitted by a county treasurer which are needed for
refunds or credits authorized by law.
(6)(a) The Motor Vehicle Fee Fund is created. On or before the last
day of each calendar quarter, the State Treasurer shall distribute all
funds in the Motor Vehicle Fee Fund as follows: (i) Fifty percent to the
county treasurer of each county, amounts in the same proportion as the
most recent allocation received by each county from the Highway
Allocation Fund; and (ii) fifty percent to the treasurer of each
municipality, amounts in the same proportion as the most recent
allocation received by each municipality from the Highway Allocation
Fund. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by
the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion
Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
(b) Funds from the Motor Vehicle Fee Fund shall be considered local
revenue available for matching state sources.
(c) All receipts by counties and municipalities from the Motor
Vehicle Fee Fund shall be used for road, bridge, and street purposes.
(7) For purposes of subdivisions (4)(a), (b), (c), and (f) of this
section, automobiles or trucks includes all trucks and combinations of
trucks or truck-tractors, except those trucks, trailers, or semitrailers
registered under section 60-3,198, and the fee is based on the gross
vehicle weight rating as reported by the manufacturer.
(8) Current model year vehicles are designated as first-year motor
vehicles for purposes of the schedules.
-22-

LB690 LB690
2025 2025
(9) When a motor vehicle is registered which is newer than the
current model year by the manufacturer's designation, the motor vehicle
is subject to the initial motor vehicle fee for six registration periods.
(10) Assembled vehicles other than assembled, reconstructed-
designated, or replica-designated automobiles shall follow the schedules
for the motor vehicle body type.
Sec. 15. Section 60-3,221, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
60-3,221 (1) Except as otherwise provided in the Motor Vehicle
Registration Act:
(a) A cabin trailer shall only be towed by a properly registered:
(i) Passenger car;
(ii) Commercial motor vehicle or apportionable vehicle;
(iii) Farm truck;
(iv) Local truck;
(v) Minitruck;
(vi) Recreational vehicle;
(vii) Bus; or
(viii) Former military vehicle;
(b) A utility trailer shall only be towed by:
(i) A properly registered passenger car;
(ii) A properly registered commercial motor vehicle or apportionable
vehicle;
(iii) A properly registered farm truck;
(iv) A properly registered local truck;
(v) A properly registered minitruck;
(vi) A properly registered recreational vehicle;
(vii) A properly registered motor vehicle which is engaged in soil
and water conservation pursuant to section 60-3,149;
(viii) A properly registered well-boring apparatus;
(ix) A dealer-plated vehicle;
-23-

LB690 LB690
2025 2025
(x) A personal-use dealer-plated vehicle;
(xi) A properly registered bus;
(xii) A properly registered public power district motor vehicle or,
beginning January 1, 2023, a properly registered metropolitan utilities
district motor vehicle; or
(xiii) A properly registered former military vehicle;
(xiv) A properly registered all-terrain vehicle; or
(xv) A properly registered utility-type vehicle;
(c) A farm trailer shall only be towed by a properly registered:
(i) Passenger car;
(ii) Commercial motor vehicle;
(iii) Farm truck;
(iv) Minitruck; or
(v) Former military vehicle;
(vi) All-terrain vehicle; or
(vii) Utility-type vehicle;
(d) A commercial trailer shall only be towed by:
(i) A properly registered motor vehicle which is engaged in soil and
water conservation pursuant to section 60-3,149;
(ii) A properly registered local truck;
(iii) A properly registered well-boring apparatus;
(iv) A properly registered commercial motor vehicle or apportionable
vehicle;
(v) A dealer-plated vehicle;
(vi) A personal-use dealer-plated vehicle;
(vii) A properly registered bus;
(viii) A properly registered farm truck; or
(ix) A properly registered public power district motor vehicle or,
beginning January 1, 2023, a properly registered metropolitan utilities
district motor vehicle;
(e) A fertilizer trailer shall only be towed by a properly
-24-

LB690 LB690
2025 2025
registered:
(i) Passenger car;
(ii) Commercial motor vehicle or apportionable vehicle;
(iii) Farm truck; or
(iv) Local truck;
(v) All-terrain vehicle; or
(vi) Utility-type vehicle;
(f) A pole and cable reel trailer shall only be towed by a properly
registered:
(i) Commercial motor vehicle or apportionable vehicle;
(ii) Local truck; or
(iii) Public power district motor vehicle or, beginning January 1,
2023, metropolitan utilities district motor vehicle;
(g) A dealer-plated trailer shall only be towed by:
(i) A dealer-plated vehicle;
(ii) A properly registered passenger car;
(iii) A properly registered commercial motor vehicle or
apportionable vehicle;
(iv) A properly registered farm truck;
(v) A properly registered minitruck;
(vi) A personal-use dealer-plated vehicle; or
(vii) A properly registered former military vehicle;
(viii) A properly registered all-terrain vehicle; or
(ix) A properly registered utility-type vehicle;
(h) Trailers registered pursuant to section 60-3,198 as part of an
apportioned fleet shall only be towed by:
(i) A properly registered motor vehicle which is engaged in soil and
water conservation pursuant to section 60-3,149;
(ii) A properly registered local truck;
(iii) A properly registered well-boring apparatus;
(iv) A properly registered commercial motor vehicle or apportionable
-25-

LB690 LB690
2025 2025
vehicle;
(v) A dealer-plated vehicle;
(vi) A personal-use dealer-plated vehicle;
(vii) A properly registered bus; or
(viii) A properly registered farm truck; and
(ix) A properly registered all-terrain vehicle; or
(x) A properly registered utility-type vehicle; and
(i) A trailer registered as a historical vehicle pursuant to
sections 60-3,130 to 60-3,134 shall only be towed by:
(i) A motor vehicle properly registered as a historical vehicle
pursuant to sections 60-3,130 to 60-3,134;
(ii) A properly registered passenger car;
(iii) A properly registered commercial motor vehicle or
apportionable vehicle; or
(iv) A properly registered local truck.
(2) Nothing in this section shall be construed to waive compliance
with the Nebraska Rules of the Road or Chapter 75.
(3) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit any motor
vehicle or trailer from displaying dealer license plates or In Transit
stickers authorized by section 60-376.
Sec. 16. Section 60-462, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
60-462 Sections 60-462 to 60-4,189 and sections 18 and 19 of this
act shall be known and may be cited as the Motor Vehicle Operator's
License Act.
Sec. 17. Section 60-463, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
60-463 For purposes of the Motor Vehicle Operator's License Act, the
definitions found in sections 60-463.01 to 60-478 and sections 18 and 19
of this act shall be used.
Sec. 18. All-terrain vehicle has the same meaning as in section 28
-26-

LB690 LB690
2025 2025
of this act.
Sec. 19. Utility-type vehicle has the same meaning as in section 29
of this act.
Sec. 20. Section 60-471, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
60-471 (1) Motor vehicle means all vehicles propelled by any power
other than muscular power.
(2) Motor vehicle does not include (a) (1) bicycles as defined in
section 60-611, (b) (2) self-propelled chairs used by persons who are
disabled, (c) (3) farm tractors, (d) (4) farm tractors used occasionally
outside general farm usage, (e) (5) road rollers, (f) (6) vehicles which
run only on rails or tracks, (g) (7) electric personal assistive mobility
devices as defined in section 60-618.02, and (h) (8) off-road designed
vehicles not authorized by law for use on a highway, including, but not
limited to, go-carts, riding lawn mowers, garden tractors, all-terrain
vehicles and utility-type vehicles as defined in section 60-6,355,
minibikes as defined in section 60-636, and snowmobiles as defined in
section 60-663.
(3) Motor vehicle includes all-terrain vehicles and utility-type
vehicles when registered pursuant to the Motor Vehicle Registration Act
and operated on a highway in accordance with section 60-6,356.
Sec. 21. Section 60-4,114, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
60-4,114 (1) The county treasurer may employ such additional
clerical help as may be necessary to assist him or her in the performance
of the ministerial duties required of him or her under the Motor Vehicle
Operator's License Act and, for such additional expense, shall be
reimbursed as set out in section 60-4,115.
(2) The director may, in his or her discretion, appoint department
personnel to examine any applicant who applies for an initial license or
whose license has been revoked or canceled to ascertain such person's
-27-

LB690 LB690
2025 2025
ability to operate a motor vehicle properly and safely. Beginning on an
implementation date designated by the director on or before January 1,
2022, the director may, in addition to appointing department personnel,
appoint driver safety course instructors to examine any applicant who
applies for an initial Class O operator's license or whose Class O
operator's license has been revoked or canceled to ascertain such
person's ability to operate a motor vehicle properly and safely.
(3) Except as otherwise provided in section 60-4,122, the
application process, in addition to the other requisites of the act,
shall include the following:
(a) An inquiry into the medical condition and visual ability of the
applicant to operate a motor vehicle;
(b) An inquiry into the applicant's ability to drive and maneuver a
motor vehicle, except that no driving skills test shall be conducted
using an all-terrain vehicle, an autocycle, or a utility-type vehicle;
and
(c) An inquiry touching upon the applicant's knowledge of the motor
vehicle laws of this state, which shall include sufficient questions to
indicate familiarity with the provisions thereof. Such knowledge inquiry
may be performed remotely if proctored by an agent approved by the
director.
(4) If an applicant is denied or refused a certificate for license
or a license is canceled, such applicant or licensee shall have the right
to an immediate appeal to the director from the decision. It shall be the
duty of the director to review the appeal and issue a final order, to be
made not later than ten days after the receipt of the appeal by the
director. The director shall issue a final order not later than ten days
following receipt of the medical opinion if the applicant or licensee
submits reports from a physician of his or her choice for the director's
consideration as provided in section 60-4,118.03. The applicant or
licensee who files an appeal pursuant to this section shall notify the
-28-

LB690 LB690
2025 2025
director in writing if he or she intends to submit records or reports for
consideration. Such notice must be received by the director not later
than ten days after an appeal is filed pursuant to this section to stay
the director's decision until after the consideration of such records or
reports as provided in section 60-4,118.03. After consideration of
evidence in the records of the applicant or licensee, including any
records submitted by the applicant or licensee, the director shall make a
determination of the physical or mental ability of the applicant or
licensee to operate a motor vehicle and shall issue a final order. The
order shall be in writing, shall be accompanied by findings of fact and
conclusions of law, and shall be sent by regular United States mail to
the last-known address of the applicant or licensee. The order may be
appealed as provided in section 60-4,105.
Sec. 22. Section 60-4,123, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
60-4,123 (1) Any person who is at least fifteen years of age may
apply for an LPD-learner's permit from the department. In order to obtain
an LPD-learner's permit, the applicant shall successfully complete a
written examination. A person may take the written examination beginning
sixty days prior to his or her fifteenth birthday but shall not be issued
a permit until he or she is fifteen years of age. The written examination
may be waived for any person who has been issued an LPE-learner's permit,
LPD-learner's permit, or SCP-school permit that has been expired for no
more than one year.
(2) Upon successful completion of the written examination and the
payment of a fee and surcharge as prescribed in section 60-4,115, the
applicant shall be issued an LPD-learner's permit as provided in section
60-4,113. The permit shall be valid for twelve months.
(3)(a) The holder of an LPD-learner's permit shall only operate a
motor vehicle on the highways of this state if he or she is accompanied
at all times by a licensed operator who is at least twenty-one years of
-29-

LB690 LB690
2025 2025
age and who has been licensed by this state or another state and if (i)
for all motor vehicles other than all-terrain vehicles, autocycles,
mopeds, motorcycles, or utility-type vehicles mopeds, he or she is
actually occupying the seat beside the licensed operator, (ii) in the
case of an autocycle, he or she is actually occupying the seat beside or
in front of the licensed operator, or (iii) in the case of (A) an all-
terrain vehicle, (B) a moped, (C) a motorcycle, other than an autocycle,
or (D) a utility-type vehicle a moped, he or she is within visual contact
of and under the supervision of, in the case of a motorcycle, a licensed
motorcycle operator or, in the case of an all-terrain vehicle, a moped,
or a utility-type vehicle, a licensed motor vehicle operator.
(b) The holder of an LPD-learner's permit shall not use any type of
interactive wireless communication device while operating a motor vehicle
on the highways of this state. Enforcement of this subdivision shall be
accomplished only as a secondary action when the holder of the LPD-
learner's permit has been cited or charged with a violation of some other
law.
(4) Department personnel or the county treasurer shall collect the
fee and surcharge prescribed in section 60-4,115 for the issuance of each
LPD-learner's permit.
Sec. 23. Section 60-4,123.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
60-4,123.01 For purposes of driver training, any person who has
attained or will attain the age of fourteen years on or before October 15
of the current year may operate a motor vehicle, other than an autocycle,
upon the highways of this state if he or she is accompanied or, in the
case of (1) an all-terrain vehicle, (2) a moped, (3) a motorcycle, other
than an autocycle, or a (4) utility-type vehicle moped, supervised at all
times by a licensed operator who is a driver training instructor
certified by the Commissioner of Education.
Sec. 24. Section 60-4,124, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
-30-

LB690 LB690
2025 2025
2024, is amended to read:
60-4,124 (1) A person who is younger than sixteen years and three
months of age but is older than fourteen years and two months of age may
be issued a school permit if such person either resides outside a city of
the metropolitan, primary, or first class or attends a school which is
outside a city of the metropolitan, primary, or first class and if such
person has held an LPE-learner's permit for two months. A school permit
shall not be issued until such person has demonstrated that he or she is
capable of successfully operating a motor vehicle, moped, or motorcycle
and has in his or her possession an issuance certificate authorizing the
county treasurer to issue a school permit. In order to obtain an issuance
certificate, the applicant shall present (a) proof of successful
completion of a department-approved driver safety course which includes
behind-the-wheel driving specifically emphasizing (i) the effects of the
consumption of alcohol on a person operating a motor vehicle, (ii)
occupant protection systems, (iii) risk assessment, and (iv) railroad
crossing safety and (b)(i) proof of successful completion of a written
examination and driving test administered by a driver safety course
instructor or (ii) a certificate in a form prescribed by the department,
signed by a parent, guardian, or licensed driver at least twenty-one
years of age, verifying that the applicant has completed fifty hours of
lawful motor vehicle operation, under conditions that reflect department-
approved driver safety course curriculum, with a parent, guardian, or
adult at least twenty-one years of age, who has a current Nebraska
operator's license or who is licensed in another state. The department
may waive the written examination if the applicant has been issued an
LPE-learner's permit or LPD-learner's permit and if such permit is valid
or has expired no more than one year prior to application. The written
examination shall not be waived if the permit being applied for contains
a class or endorsement which is different from the class or endorsement
of the LPE-learner's permit.
-31-

LB690 LB690
2025 2025
(2) A person holding a school permit may operate a motor vehicle,
moped, or motorcycle or an autocycle:
(a) To and from where he or she attends school, or property used by
the school he or she attends for purposes of school events or functions,
over the most direct and accessible route by the nearest highway from his
or her place of residence to transport such person or any family member
who resides with such person to attend duly scheduled courses of
instruction and extracurricular or school-related activities at the
school he or she attends or on property used by the school he or she
attends; or
(b) Under the personal supervision of a licensed operator. Such
licensed operator shall be at least twenty-one years of age and licensed
by this state or another state and shall (i) for all motor vehicles other
than all-terrain vehicles, autocycles, mopeds, motorcycles, or utility-
type vehicles mopeds, actually occupy the seat beside the permitholder,
(ii) in the case of an autocycle, actually occupy the seat beside or
behind the permitholder, or (iii) in the case of (A) an all-terrain
vehicle, (B) a moped, (C) a motorcycle, other than an autocycle, or (D) a
utility-type vehicle a moped, if the permitholder is within visual
contact of and under the supervision of, in the case of a motorcycle, a
licensed motorcycle operator or, in the case of an all-terrain vehicle, a
moped, or a utility-type vehicle, a licensed motor vehicle operator.
(3) The holder of a school permit shall not use any type of
interactive wireless communication device while operating a motor vehicle
on the highways of this state. Enforcement of this subsection shall be
accomplished only as a secondary action when the holder of the school
permit has been cited or charged with a violation of some other law.
(4) A person who is younger than sixteen years of age but is over
fourteen years of age may be issued an LPE-learner's permit, which permit
shall be valid for a period of six months. An LPE-learner's permit shall
not be issued until such person successfully completes a written
-32-

LB690 LB690
2025 2025
examination prescribed by the department and demonstrates that he or she
has sufficient powers of eyesight to safely operate a motor vehicle,
moped, or motorcycle or an autocycle.
(5)(a) While holding the LPE-learner's permit, the person may
operate a motor vehicle on the highways of this state if (i) for all
motor vehicles other than all-terrain vehicles, autocycles, mopeds,
motorcycles, or utility-type vehicles mopeds, he or she has seated next
to him or her a person who is a licensed operator, (ii) in the case of an
autocycle, he or she has seated next to or behind him or her a person who
is a licensed operator, or (iii) in the case of (A) an all-terrain
vehicle, (B) a moped, (C) a motorcycle, other than an autocycle, or (D) a
utility-type vehicle a moped, he or she is within visual contact of and
is under the supervision of a person who, in the case of a motorcycle, is
a licensed motorcycle operator or, in the case of an all-terrain vehicle,
a moped, or a utility-type vehicle, is a licensed motor vehicle operator.
Such licensed motor vehicle or motorcycle operator shall be at least
twenty-one years of age and licensed by this state or another state.
(b) The holder of an LPE-learner's permit shall not use any type of
interactive wireless communication device while operating a motor vehicle
on the highways of this state. Enforcement of this subdivision shall be
accomplished only as a secondary action when the holder of the LPE-
learner's permit has been cited or charged with a violation of some other
law.
(6) Department personnel or the county treasurer shall collect the
fee and surcharge prescribed in section 60-4,115 from each successful
applicant for a school or LPE-learner's permit. All school permits shall
be subject to impoundment or revocation under the terms of section
60-496. Any person who violates the terms of a school permit shall be
guilty of an infraction and shall not be eligible for another school,
farm, LPD-learner's, or LPE-learner's permit until he or she has attained
the age of sixteen years.
-33-

LB690 LB690
2025 2025
(7) Any person who holds a permit issued under this section and has
violated subdivision (3)(b) or (c) of section 28-306, subdivision (3)(b)
or (c) of section 28-394, or section 28-1254, 60-6,196, 60-6,197,
60-6,197.06, or 60-6,198 shall not be eligible for an ignition interlock
permit.
Sec. 25. Section 60-501, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
60-501 For purposes of the Motor Vehicle Safety Responsibility Act,
unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) Department means Department of Motor Vehicles;
(2) Former military vehicle means a motor vehicle that was
manufactured for use in any country's military forces and is maintained
to accurately represent its military design and markings, regardless of
the vehicle's size or weight, but is no longer used, or never was used,
by a military force;
(3) Golf car vehicle means a vehicle that has at least four wheels,
has a maximum level ground speed of less than twenty miles per hour, has
a maximum payload capacity of one thousand two hundred pounds, has a
maximum gross vehicle weight of two thousand five hundred pounds, has a
maximum passenger capacity of not more than four persons, and is designed
and manufactured for operation on a golf course for sporting and
recreational purposes;
(4) Judgment means any judgment which shall have become final by the
expiration of the time within which an appeal might have been perfected
without being appealed, or by final affirmation on appeal, rendered by a
court of competent jurisdiction of any state or of the United States, (a)
upon a cause of action arising out of the ownership, maintenance, or use
of any motor vehicle for damages, including damages for care and loss of
services, because of bodily injury to or death of any person or for
damages because of injury to or destruction of property, including the
loss of use thereof, or (b) upon a cause of action on an agreement of
-34-

LB690 LB690
2025 2025
settlement for such damages;
(5) License means any license issued to any person under the laws of
this state pertaining to operation of a motor vehicle within this state;
(6) Low-speed vehicle means a (a) four-wheeled motor vehicle (i)
whose speed attainable in one mile is more than twenty miles per hour and
not more than twenty-five miles per hour on a paved, level surface, (ii)
whose gross vehicle weight rating is less than three thousand pounds, and
(iii) that complies with 49 C.F.R. part 571, as such part existed on
January 1, 2024, or (b) three-wheeled motor vehicle (i) whose maximum
speed attainable is not more than twenty-five miles per hour on a paved,
level surface, (ii) whose gross vehicle weight rating is less than three
thousand pounds, and (iii) which is equipped with a windshield and an
occupant protection system. A motorcycle with a sidecar attached is not a
low-speed vehicle;
(7) Minitruck means a foreign-manufactured import vehicle or
domestic-manufactured vehicle which (a) is powered by an internal
combustion engine with a piston or rotor displacement of one thousand
five hundred cubic centimeters or less, (b) is sixty-seven inches or less
in width, (c) has a dry weight of four thousand two hundred pounds or
less, (d) travels on four or more tires, (e) has a top speed of
approximately fifty-five miles per hour, (f) is equipped with a bed or
compartment for hauling, (g) has an enclosed passenger cab, (h) is
equipped with headlights, taillights, turnsignals, windshield wipers, a
rearview mirror, and an occupant protection system, and (i) has a four-
speed, five-speed, or automatic transmission;
(8)(a) (8) Motor vehicle means any self-propelled vehicle which is
designed for use upon a highway, including trailers designed for use with
such vehicles, minitrucks, and low-speed vehicles. Motor vehicle includes
a former military vehicle.
(b) Motor vehicle does not include (i) (a) mopeds as defined in
section 60-637, (ii) (b) traction engines, (iii) (c) road rollers, (iv)
-35-

LB690 LB690
2025 2025
(d) farm tractors, (v) (e) tractor cranes, (vi) (f) power shovels, (vii)
(g) well drillers, (viii) (h) every vehicle which is propelled by
electric power obtained from overhead wires but not operated upon rails,
(ix) (i) electric personal assistive mobility devices as defined in
section 60-618.02, (x) (j) off-road designed vehicles, including, but not
limited to, golf car vehicles, go-carts, riding lawnmowers, garden
tractors, all-terrain vehicles and utility-type vehicles as defined in
section 60-6,355, minibikes as defined in section 60-636, and snowmobiles
as defined in section 60-663, and (xi) (k) bicycles as defined in section
60-611. ;
(c) Motor vehicle includes all-terrain vehicles as defined in
section 28 of this act and utility-type vehicles as defined in section 29
of this act when registered pursuant to the Motor Vehicle Registration
Act and operated on a highway in accordance with section 60-6,356;
(9) Nonresident means every person who is not a resident of this
state;
(10) Nonresident's operating privilege means the privilege conferred
upon a nonresident by the laws of this state pertaining to the operation
by him or her of a motor vehicle or the use of a motor vehicle owned by
him or her in this state;
(11) Operator means every person who is in actual physical control
of a motor vehicle;
(12) Owner means a person who holds the legal title of a motor
vehicle, or in the event (a) a motor vehicle is the subject of an
agreement for the conditional sale or lease thereof with the right of
purchase upon performance of the conditions stated in the agreement and
with an immediate right of possession vested in the conditional vendee or
lessee or (b) a mortgagor of a vehicle is entitled to possession, then
such conditional vendee or lessee or mortgagor shall be deemed the owner
for the purposes of the act;
(13) Person means every natural person, firm, partnership, limited
-36-

LB690 LB690
2025 2025
liability company, association, or corporation;
(14) Proof of financial responsibility means evidence of ability to
respond in damages for liability, on account of accidents occurring
subsequent to the effective date of such proof, arising out of the
ownership, maintenance, or use of a motor vehicle, (a) in the amount of
twenty-five thousand dollars because of bodily injury to or death of one
person in any one accident, (b) subject to such limit for one person, in
the amount of fifty thousand dollars because of bodily injury to or death
of two or more persons in any one accident, and (c) in the amount of
twenty-five thousand dollars because of injury to or destruction of
property of others in any one accident;
(15) Registration means registration certificate or certificates and
registration plates issued under the laws of this state pertaining to the
registration of motor vehicles;
(16) State means any state, territory, or possession of the United
States, the District of Columbia, or any province of the Dominion of
Canada; and
(17) The forfeiture of bail, not vacated, or of collateral deposited
to secure an appearance for trial shall be regarded as equivalent to
conviction of the offense charged.
Sec. 26. Section 60-601, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
60-601 Sections 60-601 to 60-6,383 and sections 28 and 29 of this
act shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Rules of the Road.
Sec. 27. Section 60-605, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
60-605 For purposes of the Nebraska Rules of the Road, except as
otherwise defined, the definitions found in sections 60-606 to 60-676 and
sections 28 and 29 of this act shall be used.
Sec. 28. Section 60-6,355, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
-37-

LB690 LB690
2025 2025
60-6,355 (1) For purposes of sections 60-6,355 to 60-6,362:
(a) All-terrain vehicle means any motor vehicle that (1) motorized
off-highway vehicle which (i) is fifty inches or less in width, (2) (ii)
has a dry weight of twelve hundred pounds or less, (3) (iii) travels on
three or more nonhighway tires, and (4) (iv) is designed for operator use
only with no passengers or is specifically designed by the original
manufacturer for the operator and one passenger.
(b)(i) Utility-type vehicle means any motorized off-highway vehicle
which (A) is seventy-four inches in width or less, (B) is not more than
one hundred eighty inches, including the bumper, in length, (C) has a dry
weight of two thousand pounds or less, (D) travels on four or more
nonhighway tires.
(ii) Utility-type vehicle does not include all-terrain vehicles,
golf car vehicles, or low-speed vehicles.
(2) All-terrain vehicles and utility-type vehicles which have been
modified or retrofitted with after-market parts to include additional
equipment not required by sections 60-6,357 and 60-6,358 shall not be
registered under the Motor Vehicle Registration Act, nor shall such
modified or retrofitted vehicles be eligible for registration in any
other category of vehicle defined in the act.
Sec. 29. (1) Utility-type vehicle means any motor vehicle that (a)
is seventy-four inches in width or less, (b) is not more than one hundred
eighty inches, including the bumper, in length, (c) has a dry weight of
two thousand pounds or less, and (d) travels on four or more nonhighway
tires.
(2) Utility-type vehicle does not include all-terrain vehicles, golf
car vehicles, or low-speed vehicles.
Sec. 30. Section 60-6,252, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
60-6,252 (1) No person shall drive or move a motor vehicle on any
highway unless such vehicle is equipped with tires in safe operating
-38-

LB690 LB690
2025 2025
condition in accordance with subsection (2) of this section.
(2) A tire shall be considered unsafe if it has:
(a) Any bump, bulge, or knot affecting the tire structure;
(b) A break that which exposes a tire body cord or is repaired with
a boot or patch;
(c) A tread depth of less than two thirty-seconds of an inch
measured in any two tread grooves at three locations equally spaced
around the circumference of the tire or, on those tires with tread wear
indicators, been worn to the point that the tread wear indicators contact
the road in any two thread grooves at three locations equally spaced
around the circumference of the tire, except that this subdivision shall
not apply to truck tires with ten or more cord plies which are mounted on
dual wheels; or
(d) Such other conditions as may be reasonably demonstrated to
render the tire unsafe.
(3) No tire shall be used on any motor vehicle that which is driven
or moved on any highway in this state if such tire was designed or
manufactured for nonhighway use. This subsection shall not apply to the
following motor vehicles registered pursuant to the Motor Vehicle
Registration Act: (a) All-terrain vehicles; and (b) utility-type
vehicles.
(4) No person shall destroy, alter, or deface any marking on a new
or usable tire that which indicates whether the tire has been
manufactured for highway or nonhighway use.
(5) No person shall sell any motor vehicle for highway use unless
the vehicle is equipped with tires that are in compliance with this
section.
Sec. 31. Section 60-6,266, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
60-6,266 (1) Every motor vehicle designated by the manufacturer as
1973 year model or later operated on any highway, road, or street in this
-39-

LB690 LB690
2025 2025
state, except farm tractors and implements of husbandry designed
primarily or exclusively for use in agricultural operations, all-terrain
vehicles, autocycles, buses, mopeds, motorcycles, motor-driven cycles,
and utility-type vehicles mopeds, and buses, shall be equipped with an
occupant protection system of a type which:
(a) Meets the requirements of 49 C.F.R. 571.208, 571.209, and
571.210 as such regulations currently exist or as the regulations existed
when the occupant protection system was originally installed by the
manufacturer; or
(b) If the occupant protection system has been replaced, meets the
requirements of 49 C.F.R. 571.208, 571.209, and 571.210 that applied to
the originally installed occupant protection system or of a more recently
issued version of such regulations. The purchaser of any such vehicle may
designate the make or brand of or furnish such occupant protection system
to be installed.
(2) Every autocycle shall be equipped with a three-point safety belt
system.
(3) Any person selling a motor vehicle in this state not in
compliance with this section shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor.
Sec. 32. Section 60-6,270, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
60-6,270 (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) or (3) of this
section, no driver shall operate a motor vehicle upon a highway or street
in this state unless the driver and each front-seat occupant in the
vehicle are wearing occupant protection systems and all occupant
protection systems worn are properly adjusted and fastened.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section,
no driver shall operate an autocycle upon a highway or street of this
state unless the driver is wearing a three-point safety belt system and
it is properly adjusted and fastened.
(3) The following persons shall not be required to wear an occupant
-40-

LB690 LB690
2025 2025
protection system or a three-point safety belt system:
(a) A person who possesses written verification from a physician
that the person is unable to wear an occupant protection system or a
three-point safety belt system for medical reasons;
(b) A rural letter carrier of the United States Postal Service while
performing his or her duties as a rural letter carrier between the first
and last delivery points; and
(c) A member of an emergency medical service while involved in
patient care; and .
(d) The operator or a passenger of an all-terrain vehicle.
(4) For purposes of this section, motor vehicle means (a) a vehicle
required by section 60-6,266 to be equipped with an occupant protection
system or a three-point safety belt system, (b) an all-terrain vehicle,
or (c) a utility-type vehicle.
Sec. 33. Section 60-6,279, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
60-6,279 (1) A person shall not operate a motorcycle or moped on any
highway in this state unless such person is:
(a) Wearing a protective helmet of the type and design manufactured
for use by operators of such vehicles and unless such helmet is secured
properly on the user's head with a chin strap while the vehicle is in
motion. All such protective helmets shall be designed to reduce injuries
to the user resulting from head impacts and shall be designed to protect
the user by remaining on the user's head, deflecting blows, resisting
penetration, and spreading the force of impact. Each such helmet shall
consist of lining, padding, and chin strap and shall meet or exceed the
standards established in the United States Department of Transportation's
Federal Motor Vehicle Safety Standard No. 218, 49 C.F.R. 571.218, for
motorcycle helmets; or
(b)(i) At least twenty-one years of age; and
(ii)(A) Has a Nebraska Class M license and received such Class M
-41-

LB690 LB690
2025 2025
license prior to May 1, 2024, and has completed the Motorcycle Safety
Foundation three-hour Basic eCourse and submitted proof of such
completion to the Department of Motor Vehicles. Proof of such completion
shall be in a manner approved by the department;
(B) Has a Nebraska Class M license and received such Class M license
on or after May 1, 2024, and has completed the basic motorcycle safety
course as provided in the Motorcycle Safety Education Act and submitted
proof of such completion to the Department of Motor Vehicles. Proof of
such completion shall be in a manner approved by the department; or
(C) Has a license to operate a motorcycle issued by another state.
(2) A person shall not be a passenger on a motorcycle or moped on
any highway in this state unless:
(a) Such person is wearing a protective helmet described in
subdivision (1)(a) of this section; or
(b)(i) Such person is at least twenty-one years of age; and
(ii) The person operating the motorcycle or moped is a person
described in subdivision (1)(b) of this section.
(3) The Department of Motor Vehicles shall modify the existing
system of the department by January 1, 2024, to allow the date of
completion of such course to be recorded on the person's record provided
for in section 60-483.
(4) A person shall not operate any all-terrain vehicle, moped, a
motorcycle, or utility-type vehicle or moped on any highway in this state
unless such person employs one of the following forms of eye protection:
(a) Glasses that cover the orbital region of the person's face, (b) a
protective face shield attached to a protective helmet, (c) goggles, or
(d) a windshield on the motorcycle or moped that protects the operator's
and passenger's horizontal line of vision in all operating positions.
Sec. 34. Section 60-6,356, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
60-6,356 (1)(a) Any all-terrain vehicle or utility-type vehicle
-42-

LB690 LB690
2025 2025
registered pursuant to the Motor Vehicle Registration Act may be operated
on any highway except as provided in subdivision (b) of this subsection.
(b) Any all-terrain vehicle or utility-type vehicle shall not be
operated on:
(i) The National System of Interstate and Defense Highways;
(ii) Highways that are a part of the state highway system as defined
in section 39-1302;
(iii) Expressways;
(iv) Freeways; and
(v) Highways when prohibited by an ordinance adopted by a county,
city, or village.
(2)(a) Any (1) An all-terrain vehicle or a utility-type vehicle not
registered pursuant to the Motor Vehicle Registration Act shall not be
operated on any controlled-access highway with more than two marked
traffic lanes. The crossing of any controlled-access highway with more
than two marked traffic lanes shall not be permitted except as provided
in subsections (10) and (11) (9) and (10) of this section.
(b) Subsections (3), (4), and (6), through (9) (2), (3), and (5)
through (8) of this section authorize and apply to operation of any an
all-terrain vehicle or a utility-type vehicle not registered pursuant to
the Motor Vehicle Registration Act only on a highway other than a
controlled-access highway with more than two marked traffic lanes.
(3) Any (2) An all-terrain vehicle or a utility-type vehicle not
registered pursuant to the Motor Vehicle Registration Act may be operated
in accordance with the operating requirements of subsection (4) (3) of
this section:
(a) Outside the corporate limits of a city, village, or
unincorporated village if incidental to the vehicle's use for
agricultural purposes;
(b) Within the corporate limits of a city or village if authorized
by the city or village by ordinance adopted in accordance with this
-43-

LB690 LB690
2025 2025
section; or
(c) Within an unincorporated village if authorized by the county
board of the county in which the unincorporated village is located by
ordinance adopted resolution in accordance with this section.
(4) Any (3) An all-terrain vehicle or a utility-type vehicle not
registered pursuant to the Motor Vehicle Registration Act may be operated
as authorized in subsection (3) (2) of this section when such operation
occurs only between the hours of sunrise and sunset. Any person operating
any an all-terrain vehicle or a utility-type vehicle as authorized in
subsection (3) (2) of this section shall have a valid Class O operator's
license or a farm permit as provided in section 60-4,126, shall have
liability insurance coverage for such the all-terrain vehicle or a
utility-type vehicle while operating such the all-terrain vehicle or a
utility-type vehicle on a highway, and shall not operate such vehicle at
a speed in excess of thirty miles per hour. The person operating such the
all-terrain vehicle or a utility-type vehicle shall provide proof of such
insurance coverage to any peace officer requesting such proof within five
days of such a request. When operating any an all-terrain vehicle or a
utility-type vehicle as authorized in subsection (3) (2) of this section,
the headlight and taillight of the vehicle shall be on and the vehicle
shall be equipped with a bicycle safety flag that which extends not less
than five feet above ground attached to the rear of such vehicle. The
bicycle safety flag shall be triangular in shape with an area of not less
than thirty square inches and shall be day-glow in color.
(5) Any all-terrain vehicle or utility-type vehicle (4) All-terrain
vehicles and utility-type vehicles may be operated without complying with
subsection (4) (3) of this section on highways in parades which have been
authorized by the State of Nebraska or any department, board, commission,
or political subdivision of the state.
(6) (5) The crossing of a highway other than a controlled-access
highway with more than two marked traffic lanes shall be permitted by any
-44-

LB690 LB690
2025 2025
an all-terrain vehicle or a utility-type vehicle not registered pursuant
to the Motor Vehicle Registration Act without complying with subsection
(4) (3) of this section only if:
(a) The crossing is made at an angle of approximately ninety degrees
to the direction of the highway and at a place where no obstruction
prevents a quick and safe crossing;
(b) The vehicle is brought to a complete stop before crossing the
shoulder or roadway of the highway;
(c) The operator yields the right-of-way to all oncoming traffic
that constitutes an immediate potential hazard;
(d) In crossing a divided highway, the crossing is made only at an
intersection of such highway with another highway; and
(e) Both the headlight and taillight of the vehicle are on when the
crossing is made.
(7) Any all-terrain vehicle or utility-type vehicle not registered
pursuant to the Motor Vehicle Registration Act (6) All-terrain vehicles
and utility-type vehicles may be operated outside the corporate limits of
any municipality by electric utility personnel within the course of their
employment in accordance with the operation requirements of subsection
(4) (3) of this section, except that the operation of the vehicle
pursuant to this subsection need not be limited to the hours between
sunrise and sunset.
(8) Any (7) A city or village may adopt an ordinance authorizing the
operation of all-terrain vehicles and utility-type vehicles not
registered pursuant to the Motor Vehicle Registration Act within the
corporate limits of the city or village if the operation is in accordance
with subsection (4) (3) of this section. The city or village may place
other restrictions on the operation of all-terrain vehicles and utility-
type vehicles within its corporate limits.
(9) Any (8) A county board may adopt an ordinance that authorizes a
resolution authorizing the operation of all-terrain vehicles and utility-
-45-

LB690 LB690
2025 2025
type vehicles not registered pursuant to the Motor Vehicle Registration
Act within any unincorporated village within the county if the operation
is in accordance with subsection (4) (3) of this section. The county
board may place other restrictions on the operation of all-terrain
vehicles and utility-type vehicles within the unincorporated village.
(10) (9) Except as provided in subsection (11) (10) of this section,
the crossing of a controlled-access highway with more than two marked
traffic lanes shall be permitted by any a utility-type vehicle (a)
registered pursuant to the Motor Vehicle Registration Act or (b) not so
registered if its if the operation is in accordance with the operation
requirements of subsection (4) (3) of this section and if the following
requirements are met:
(a) The crossing is made at an intersection that:
(i) Is controlled by a traffic control signal; or
(ii) For any intersection located outside the corporate limits of a
city or village, is controlled by stop signs;
(b) The crossing at such intersection is made in compliance with the
traffic control signal or stop signs; and
(c) The crossing at such intersection is specifically authorized as
follows:
(i) If such intersection is located within the corporate limits of a
city or village, by ordinance of such city or village;
(ii) If such intersection is located within an unincorporated
village, by ordinance adopted by resolution of the county board of the
county in which such unincorporated village is located; or
(iii) If such intersection is located outside the corporate limits
of a city or village and outside any unincorporated village, by ordinance
adopted by resolution of the county board of the county in which such
intersection is located.
(11) When any (10) When the use of the all-terrain vehicle or
utility-type vehicle not registered pursuant to the Motor Vehicle
-46-

LB690 LB690
2025 2025
Registration Act is operated only for an agricultural purpose, the
crossing of a controlled-access highway with more than two marked traffic
lanes shall be permitted if such vehicle is operated in accordance with
subsection (4) (3) of this section.
Sec. 35. Section 77-27,132, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-27,132 (1) There is hereby created a fund to be designated the
Revenue Distribution Fund which shall be set apart and maintained by the
Tax Commissioner. Revenue not required to be credited to the General Fund
or any other specified fund may be credited to the Revenue Distribution
Fund. Credits and refunds of such revenue shall be paid from the Revenue
Distribution Fund. The balance of the amount credited, after credits and
refunds, shall be allocated as provided by the statutes creating such
revenue.
(2) The Tax Commissioner shall pay to a depository bank designated
by the State Treasurer all amounts collected under the Nebraska Revenue
Act of 1967. The Tax Commissioner shall present to the State Treasurer
bank receipts showing amounts so deposited in the bank, and of the
amounts so deposited the State Treasurer shall:
(a)(i) For transactions occurring on or after October 1, 2014, and
before July 1, 2024, credit to the Game and Parks Commission Capital
Maintenance Fund all of the proceeds of the sales and use taxes imposed
pursuant to section 77-2703 on the sale or lease of motorboats as defined
in section 37-1204, personal watercraft as defined in section 37-1204.01,
all-terrain vehicles as defined in section 60-103, and utility-type
vehicles as defined in section 60-135.01; and
(ii) For transactions occurring on or after July 1, 2024, credit to
the Game and Parks Commission Capital Maintenance Fund all of the
proceeds of the sales and use taxes imposed pursuant to section 77-2703
on the sale or lease of motorboats as defined in section 37-1204,
personal watercraft as defined in section 37-1204.01, all-terrain
-47-

LB690 LB690
2025 2025
vehicles as defined in section 60-103, and utility-type vehicles as
defined in section 60-135.01, and from such proceeds, transfers shall be
made to the Nebraska Emergency Medical System Operations Fund as provided
in section 37-327.02;
(b) Credit to the Highway Trust Fund all of the proceeds of the
sales and use taxes derived from the sale or lease for periods of more
than thirty-one days of motor vehicles other than all-terrain vehicles as
defined in section 60-103 and utility-type vehicles as defined in section
60-135.01, trailers, and semitrailers, except that the proceeds equal to
any sales tax rate provided for in section 77-2701.02 that is in excess
of five percent derived from the sale or lease for periods of more than
thirty-one days of motor vehicles, trailers, and semitrailers shall be
credited to the Highway Allocation Fund;
(c) For transactions occurring on or after July 1, 2013, and before
July 1, 2042, of the proceeds of the sales and use taxes derived from
transactions other than those listed in subdivisions (2)(a), (b), and (e)
of this section from a sales tax rate of one-quarter of one percent,
credit monthly eighty-five percent to the Highway Trust Fund and fifteen
percent to the Highway Allocation Fund;
(d) Of the proceeds of the sales and use taxes derived from
transactions other than those listed in subdivisions (2)(a), (b), and (e)
of this section, credit to the Property Tax Credit Cash Fund the amount
certified under section 77-27,237, if any such certification is made; and
(e) For transactions occurring on or after July 1, 2023, credit to
the Department of Transportation Aeronautics Capital Improvement Fund all
of the proceeds of the sales and use taxes imposed pursuant to section
77-2703 on the sale or lease of aircraft as defined in section 3-101.
The balance of all amounts collected under the Nebraska Revenue Act
of 1967 shall be credited to the General Fund.
Sec. 36. This act becomes operative on January 1, 2026.
Sec. 37. Original sections 23-187, 60-103, 60-123, 60-135.01,
-48-

LB690 LB690
2025 2025
60-153, 60-305, 60-339, 60-358.01, 60-3,143, 60-3,187, 60-3,190, 60-471,
60-4,114, 60-4,123, 60-4,123.01, 60-6,252, 60-6,266, 60-6,270, 60-6,355,
and 60-6,356, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and sections
60-3,100, 60-3,104, 60-3,135.01, 60-3,221, 60-462, 60-463, 60-4,124,
60-501, 60-601, 60-605, 60-6,279, and 77-27,132, Revised Statutes
Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-49-